Utah statutes.
34-20a-7.   Arbitration.

If the bargaining representative and the corporate authorities are unable to reach an agreement within 30 days after negotiations, all unresolved issues shall be submitted to arbitration.



Enacted by Chapter 102, 1975 General Session

